Nevada, session 83, AB22.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 287.04345 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04345 1. The Program is subject to the provisions of
chapter 333 of NRS.
2. The [Board] Executive Officer shall act as the chief of the
using agency for the purposes of NRS 333.335.
3. If a committee to evaluate proposals for a contract for the
Program is established pursuant to NRS 333.335 [, any number of
members] :
(a) At least one member of the Board [may] must be appointed
to the evaluation committee. [If one or more members of the Board
are appointed to an evaluation committee:
(a)] (b) No action or deliberation regarding any business of the
Board other than the confidential review of the proposals pursuant
to NRS 333.335 may be taken or conducted by the evaluation
committee.
[(b)] (c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph [(a),] (b), a
meeting of the evaluation committee is not subject to chapter 241 of
NRS.
[4. The Board shall review the results of any evaluation of
proposals for a contract for the Program pursuant to NRS 333.335 in
a closed meeting.
5. The Board shall take the following actions only in an open
meeting:
(a) Award the contract pursuant to NRS 333.335;
(b) Cancel the request for proposals; or
(c) Modify and reissue the request for proposals.]
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB22*